Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2610
Board; advise Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

The State Board of Health shall advise the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services regarding:

(1) Rules and regulations for the government of the division;

(2) The policies of the division as they relate to support provided to the board;

(3) The policies of the division concerning the professions and occupations described in section 71-2610.01;

(4) Communication and cooperation among the professional boards; and

(5) Plans of organization or reorganization of the division.

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 16, p. 1104;

Laws 1981, LB 249, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 449, § 8;

Laws 1982, LB 450, § 7;

Laws 1982, LB 448, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 41;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 632;

Laws 2003, LB 56, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 549.